Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-504
Terms, defined; pregnancy; effect.

(1) The term dependent child shall mean a child under the age of nineteen years who is living with a relative or with a caretaker who is the child's legal guardian or conservator in a place of residence maintained by one or more of such relatives or caretakers as his, her, or their own home, or which child has been removed from the home of his or her father, mother, grandfather, grandmother, brother, sister, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, first or second cousin, nephew, or niece as a result of judicial determination to the effect that continuation in the home would be contrary to the safety and welfare of the child and such child has been placed in a foster family home or child care institution as a result of such determination, when the state or any court having jurisdiction of such child is responsible for the care and placement of such child and one of the following conditions exists: (a) Such child received aid from the state in or for the month in which court proceedings leading to such determination were initiated; (b) such child would have received assistance in or for such month if application had been made therefor; or (c) such child had been living with such a relative specified in this subsection at any time within six months prior to the month in which such proceedings were initiated and would have received such aid in or for the month that such proceedings were initiated if in such month the child had been living with, and removed from the home of, such a relative and application had been made therefor.

(2) In awarding aid to dependent children payments, the term dependent child shall include an unborn child but only during the last three months of pregnancy. A pregnant woman may be eligible but only (a) if it has been medically verified that the child is expected to be born in the month such payments are made or expected to be born within the three-month period following such month of payment and (b) if such child had been born and was living with her in the month of payment, she would be eligible for aid to families with dependent children. As soon as it is medically determined that pregnancy exists, a pregnant woman who meets the other requirements for aid to dependent children shall be eligible for medical assistance.

(3) A physically or medically handicapped child shall mean a child who, by reason of a physical defect or infirmity, whether congenital or acquired by accident, injury, or disease, is or may be expected to be totally or partially incapacitated for education or for remunerative occupation.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 4, p. 181;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-504;

R.S.1943, § 43-504;

Laws 1947, c. 157, § 1, p. 433;

Laws 1959, c. 190, § 1, p. 692;

Laws 1963, c. 254, § 1, p. 773;

Laws 1965, c. 241, § 1, p. 687;

Laws 1965, c. 242, § 1, p. 689;

Laws 1967, c. 409, § 1, p. 1272;

Laws 1969, c. 343, § 1, p. 1205;

Laws 1969, c. 344, § 1, p. 1209;

Laws 1973, LB 159, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 397, § 1;

Laws 1981, Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 790, § 26;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 20, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 455, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 864, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 32;

Laws 2007, LB351, § 1.